Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3952.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 142F.101, is amended to read: 142F.101 new text begin INCOME AND new text end ASSET LIMITATIONS FOR SUPPLEMENTAL NUTRITION ASSISTANCE PROGRAM HOUSEHOLDS. new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Income limits. new text end deleted text begin Alldeleted text end new text begin The county or Tribal agency must determine eachnew text end Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program (SNAP) deleted text begin households must be determineddeleted text end new text begin householdnew text end eligible for the benefit discussed under section 256.029. new text begin Each new text end SNAP deleted text begin householdsdeleted text end new text begin householdnew text end must demonstrate that deleted text begin theirdeleted text end new text begin its net income meets federal SNAP requirements and itsnew text end gross income is equal to or less than 200 percent of the federal poverty guidelines for the same family size. new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Asset limits. new text end new text begin Each SNAP household must demonstrate that it meets the personal property limitations under section 256P.02, except that a vehicle with a trade-in value equal to or greater than $100,000 is not excluded under section 256P.02, subdivision 3, and must be applied to the personal property limitations under section 256P.02, subdivision 2. new text end